Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.040

Authorized committee. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public official.

[ 2024 c 164 s 204.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.